District of Columbia statutes.
42-1753

Repealed

Prohibited names.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 15, 30 DCR 390
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(n), 31 DCR 4023
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(q), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-1934.